Missouri, session 2026, HB2710.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 162.821, RSMo, is repealed and three
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
160.524, 162.192, and 162.821, to read as follows:
160.524. 1. (1) The state board of education shall
develop an annual school accountability report card for each
public school district, public school, and public charter
school in the state for the purpose of providing information
about school performance in accordance with the provisions
of this section. In addition to providing information about
student performance, the report card shall be designed to
satisfy federal reporting requirements for the disclosure of
information about students, staff, finances, and other data.
(2) Each school accountability report card shall be
designed in a standardized, clear, and easily accessible
form so that the accountability report card can be easily
understood by parents, taxpayers, school personnel,
legislators, and the media and shall include a summary
intended for parents and guardians that:
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SCS HCS HB 2710 2
(a) Explains the school's performance level and
underlying indicators in nontechnical terms;
(b) Identifies areas of strength and areas in need of
improvement;
(c) Highlights year-to-year progress, including
student academic growth; and
(d) Provides information on how families may engage
with the school to support student learning.
The plain-language summary shall include a clear explanation
of student academic growth and how the school's growth
compares to the state's expectations.
2. The state board of education shall assign the
duties of implementing the provisions of this section to the
department of elementary and secondary education or may
contract with a private entity in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 34.
3. (1) The state board of education shall provide an
embargoed version of the school accountability report cards
for the previous school year to each public school district,
public school, and public charter school by September
fifteenth of each year.
(2) The state board of education shall provide an
appeals process and criteria for an appeal of information in
the school accountability report card.
(3) Before October thirty-first of each year, each
public school district, public school, and public charter
school shall publish in a clear and easily accessible
location on its website the district and school
accountability report cards including each underlying
indicator that is used to derive the performance rating and
the rates of pupil attendance from the previous school year.

SCS HCS HB 2710 3
4. The state board of education shall assign each
public school district, public school, and public charter
school one of the following ratings, which shall be based on
a zero-to-one-hundred scale:
(1) "A" for those districts and schools producing
excellent student outcomes;
(2) "B" for those districts and schools producing more-
than-satisfactory student outcomes;
(3) "C" for those districts and schools producing
satisfactory student outcomes;
(4) "D" for those districts and schools producing less-
than-satisfactory student outcomes; and
(5) "F" for those districts and schools failing to
produce adequate student outcomes.
5. (1) The state board of education shall assign each
public school district, public school, and public charter
school an overall performance rating of "A", "B", "C", "D",
or "F", derived from multiple measures of school performance
as provided in this section.
(2) The benchmark for excellent student outcomes or an
"A" rating shall be the top decile of the composite score of
the measures outlined in subsection 8 of this section.
(3) A public school district, public school, or public
charter school that does not test at least ninety-five
percent of its students shall have assessment participation
rates reported separately and clearly identified on the
school accountability report card. Assessment participation
rates shall not result in an automatic reduction of the
district's or school's performance level but shall be
included to provide transparency and context for parents and
the public.

SCS HCS HB 2710 4
6. (1) There is hereby created the "Show Me Success
Program" to provide additional funding, subject to
appropriation, to public schools and public charter schools
that demonstrate strong student academic growth, sustained
improvement over time, or success in closing achievement
gaps, as determined by the department of elementary and
secondary education.
(2) Subject to appropriations, the department may
award performance-based funding to eligible public schools
and public charter schools based on one or more of the
following criteria:
(a) Student academic growth above the state average,
including value-added growth and growth to proficiency;
(b) Demonstrated improvement in student outcomes over
multiple years;
(c) Significant improvement among historically
underserved student groups;
(d) High levels of student readiness for postsecondary
education, training, or employment; or
(e) Demonstrated improvement in early literacy
outcomes, including growth in reading achievement for
students in kindergarten through grade three, as measured by
100 multiple indicators of reading development and progress over
101 time.
102 (3) The department shall establish, by rule, the
103 methodology for determining eligibility, award amounts, and
104 distribution of funds under this subsection.
105 (4) No school or charter school shall be guaranteed
106 funding under this subsection, and awards shall be made only
107 to the extent that funds are appropriated by the general
108 assembly.

SCS HCS HB 2710 5
109 (5) Moneys shall be distributed to the school's fiscal
110 agent before December first of each year, and one hundred
111 percent of the moneys received shall be placed in the
112 school's classroom incidental fund to be used in a manner
113 determined by the governing body of the district or charter
114 school to promote teacher recruitment and retention.
115 7. (1) The department shall develop a criteria-
116 referenced growth measure, called "growth to proficiency",
117 in addition to the existing normative value-added growth
118 measure.
119 (2) Growth to proficiency shall evaluate for each
120 student with two consecutive years of Missouri assessment
121 program performance levels whether that student has made
122 sufficient progress to put them on a trajectory to reach or
123 exceed grade-level within three years or by the end of grade
124 ten, whichever comes first.
125 8. The rating under subsection 4 of this section for a
126 public school district, public school, or public charter
127 school shall be based on the following factors:
128 (1) Student academic achievement level, calculated as
129 the percentage of students proficient or higher on required
130 English language arts, math, and science assessments through
131 the Missouri assessment program;
132 (2) Student academic growth in English language arts,
133 math, and science using a growth to proficiency metric and a
134 value-added growth metric of:
135 (a) All students; and
136 (b) The lowest-performing quartile of students; and
137 (3) For high schools:
138 (a) The student four-year graduation rate; and
139 (b) A "Success-Ready Graduate" measure, calculated by
140 the department of elementary and secondary education, which

SCS HCS HB 2710 6
141 shall include the number of students graduating with merit
142 or distinction and which shall include consideration of:
143 a. Advanced placement examinations upon which students
144 achieve a score of three or higher;
145 b. International baccalaureate examinations for an
146 international baccalaureate diploma programme course upon
147 which students achieve a score of four or higher;
148 c. Dual enrollment in core subjects with a "C" course
149 grade or higher;
150 d. Earning an industry-recognized credential or career
151 technical education certificate related to an occupation
152 that is high wage, high demand;
153 e. Completion of an early bachelor's or associate
154 degree; and
155 f. Completion of stackable credentials.
156 9. The rating assigned under subsection 4 of this
157 section for elementary and middle schools shall be based on
158 overall student academic achievement level, value-added
159 growth, and growth to proficiency as follows:
160 (1) Academic achievement level, value-added academic
161 growth, and growth to proficiency shall be calculated and
162 reported separately for English language arts, literacy,
163 math, and science; and
164 (2) As a portion of the rating assigned:
165 (a) Academic achievement level shall represent forty
166 percent of the rating;
167 (b) Value-added growth shall represent thirty percent
168 of the rating; and
169 (c) Growth to proficiency shall represent thirty
170 percent of the rating.
171 10. At least seventy-five percent of the rating
172 assigned under subsection 4 of this section for high schools

SCS HCS HB 2710 7
173 shall be based on overall student academic achievement
174 level, value-added growth, and growth to proficiency as
175 follows:
176 (1) Academic achievement level, value-added academic
177 growth, and growth to proficiency shall be calculated and
178 reported separately for English language arts, math, and
179 science; and
180 (2) As a portion of the rating assigned:
181 (a) Academic achievement level shall represent twenty-
182 five percent of the rating;
183 (b) Value-added growth shall represent twenty-five
184 percent of the rating;
185 (c) Growth to proficiency shall represent twenty-five
186 percent of the rating;
187 (d) The success-ready graduate measure shall represent
188 fifteen percent of the rating; and
189 (e) The student four-year graduation rate shall
190 represent ten percent of the rating.
191 11. Public school districts, public schools, and
192 public charter schools shall annually report for high
193 schools the number of graduates who within six months of
194 graduation attend postsecondary education or training
195 programs, serve in the military, serve in national or
196 community service, are employed in the farming or ranching
197 industry, or are employed in a living-wage career as
198 determined by a governmental agency or nongovernmental
199 organization with expertise in living-wage calculation.
200 12. For public school districts, the annual school
201 accountability report card rating shall be calculated
202 following the same method used for calculating a school
203 report except at the district level.

SCS HCS HB 2710 8
204 13. The state board of education shall provide a
205 statewide report card that provides the following:
206 (1) The percentages of Missouri students annually
207 attending schools rated "A", "B", "C", "D", or "F", with the
208 objective of increasing the percentage of students attending
209 more highly rated schools each year; and
210 (2) The performance of Missouri students on state
211 assessments relative to the National Assessment of
212 Educational Progress (NAEP), with the objective that
213 proficiency rates on both assessments be reasonably aligned.
214 14. For the purposes of this section, the development
215 and publication of an annual school accountability report
216 card shall not be required for any special school district
217 or state-operated school in which all of the students
218 enrolled are students with disabilities.
162.192. 1. For purposes of this section, "financial
ledger" means a searchable, machine-readable, publicly
accessible database maintained by a school district or
charter school that:
(1) Sets forth all financial transactions conducted
with school district or charter school funds, including, but
not limited to, the school funds established pursuant to
section 165.011;
(2) Is available without login credentials,
registration, or fees;
(3) Is downloadable and exportable in formats
including, but not limited to, comma-separated values (CSV)
format and Microsoft Excel format;
(4) Records all transactions using Missouri financial
accounting manual classification categories, as applicable;
and

SCS HCS HB 2710 9
(5) Includes the following minimum required data
fields for each financial transaction, and is searchable and
filterable by such fields, at minimum:
(a) Transaction date;
(b) Transaction amount;
(c) Revenue or expenditure designation;
(d) Fund code;
(e) Function code;
(f) Object code;
(g) Vendor or payee name; and
(h) Description or memo field.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, each school district and charter school shall
maintain a financial ledger on its publicly accessible
website. The homepage of each public or charter school's
website shall include a direct link to the financial ledger
of the school district or charter school that has oversight
responsibility for that public or charter school. The link
shall make the financial ledger accessible within one click,
shall be clearly labeled as a link to the school district's
or charter school's financial ledger, and shall be
functional and mobile-responsive. The department may
provide standardized language or icons that public and
charter schools may use for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with this subsection.
3. A school district's or charter school's financial
ledger shall be updated at least monthly. Details of each
calendar month's financial transactions shall be posted no
later than forty-five days after the close of that calendar
month.
4. For historical record keeping purposes, a school
district or charter school shall maintain complete financial

SCS HCS HB 2710 10
ledger data on its publicly accessible website for no fewer
than five prior fiscal years.
5. A school district or charter school may redact
protected personal information on the financial ledger only
to the extent required by applicable law. Vendor names,
amounts, and accounting codes shall not be redacted.
Payroll data may be presented in aggregated form where
disclosure of individual information is restricted.
6. Debt obligations shall be posted in a separate
section of the financial ledger, with disclosure of the
following information:
(1) Outstanding debt balances;
(2) Issuance dates;
(3) Repayment schedules;
(4) Annual debt service amounts; and
(5) Debt service as a percentage of total expenditures.
7. The department may provide or approve standardized
templates or platforms a school district or charter school
may use to comply with the provisions of this section. A
school district or charter school may use a third-party
template or platform that is approved by the department.
8. The department may provide guidance to assist
school districts and charter schools in complying with the
provisions of this section. Such guidance may include:
(1) High-level expenditure summaries by classification
category under the Missouri financial accounting manual;
(2) Standardized definitions of terms to be used in
the financial ledger; and
(3) Clear explanations of methodology and limitations
applicable to the compilation and presentation of financial
ledger data.

SCS HCS HB 2710 11
9. School districts and charter schools shall annually
certify compliance with this section to the department. The
department shall promulgate rules establishing procedures
and timelines for school districts and charter schools to
certify compliance.
10. If the department finds that any school district
or charter school has violated a provision of this section,
the department may withhold up to five percent of the state
aid to which the school district or charter school is
entitled under chapter 160 or 163 for the current school
year until the school district or charter school proves to
the satisfaction of the department that the school district
or charter school is no longer in violation of this section.
11. The department shall establish a process for
members of the public to file complaints with the department
if they believe a school district or charter school has
violated any provision of this section. The department may
establish a public compliance dashboard on the department's
website to enable members of the public to check whether a
particular school district or charter school is certified as
100 in compliance with the provisions of this section.
101 12. The department shall promulgate rules to implement
102 the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a
103 rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
104 created under the authority delegated in this section shall
105 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
106 all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
107 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
108 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
109 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
110 the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
111 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of

SCS HCS HB 2710 12
112 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
113 August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
162.821. The district secretary shall keep a record of
the proceedings of all annual and special elections of the
voters of the district and of the proceedings of the board
of education. He shall make copies of the election notices,
contracts with teachers, certificates and all other papers
relating to the business of the district, and securely keep
the same. He shall maintain a correct plat of the district
and shall promptly notify the department of elementary and
secondary education and the county clerk of each county
affected of all changes in the boundaries of the district.
He shall transmit to the county commission and to the state
department of elementary and secondary education, on or
before the fifteenth day of August in each year, a report
embracing the following items:
(1) The number of children, male and female, attending
the public schools during the year;
(2) Total number of days' attendance by all such
children;
(3) The number of days the public schools of the
district have been maintained during the school year;
(4) The number of teachers employed, male and female,
and the wages per month of each;
(5) Estimated value of school property owned and
managed by the district;
(6) Assessed valuation of the district;
(7) Rate of school tax on the assessed valuation of
the district;
(8) Cash on hand at the beginning of the year;
(9) Tuition fees received and credited to the
teachers' fund of the district;

SCS HCS HB 2710 13
(10) Public funds received by county treasurer;
(11) District tax received by county (or township)
treasurer;
(12) Amount paid on teachers' wages;
(13) Amount paid for incidental expenses;
(14) Amount expended for purchasing site, erecting
schoolhouses, rent and repairs;
(15) Amount expended in cancelling bonded indebtedness
and paying interest on same;
(16) Amount expended for library;
(17) Amount expended for legal services. If the
report does not include the amount expended for legal
services, then the attorney general may investigate the
violation of this subdivision and may bring a civil action,
including an action for injunctive relief, against the
school district or charter school. Such action shall be
brought in the county where the school district or charter
school is located;
(18) Cash on hand at the end of the year;
[(18)] (19) Such other information as may be required
by the state board of education.
✓